Maine, session 132, LD677.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 17-A MRSA §1051, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 1975, c. 499, §1, is repealed
and the following enacted in its place:
2. As used in this chapter, "machine gun" means:
A. A weapon of any description, by whatever name known, loaded or unloaded, that
is capable of discharging a number of projectiles in rapid succession by one manual or
mechanical action on the trigger or firing mechanism; or
B. Any part designed and intended solely and exclusively, or combination of parts
designed and intended, for use in converting a weapon into a machine gun, including,
but not limited to:
(1) A device that, when installed in or attached to a firearm, allows the firearm to
discharge 2 or more shots with a single pull of the trigger;
(2) A device that applies force to a firearm’s trigger bar to prevent it from limiting
the weapon to firing only one round each time the trigger is depressed; or
(3) A power-driven device that, when installed in or attached to a firearm,
repeatedly activates the trigger of the firearm through the use of a crank, a lever or
any other part that is turned in a circular motion.
Sec. 2. 17-A MRSA §1060 is enacted to read:
§1060. Possession of rapid-fire device
1. A person is guilty of possession of a rapid-fire device if, without authority to do so,
that person knowingly possesses a rapid-fire device.
2. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the following terms
have the following meanings.
A. "Rapid-fire device" means a device, part or combination of parts that is not a
machine gun and that materially increases the rate of fire of a semi-automatic firearm
above the rate of fire of the semi-automatic firearm absent the device, part or
combination of parts, including, but not limited to:
(1) A device that, when installed in or attached to a firearm, increases the rate of
fire of the firearm by using energy from the recoil of the firearm to generate a
reciprocating action that facilitates repeated activation of the trigger;
(2) A device that, when installed in or attached to a firearm, fires both when the
trigger is pulled and on release of the trigger; or
(3) A manual device that, when installed in or attached to a firearm, repeatedly
activates the trigger of the firearm through the use of a crank, a lever or any other
part that is turned in a circular motion.
B. "Semi-automatic firearm" means a firearm that:
(1) Upon the initiation of the firing sequence, fires the first chambered cartridge
and uses a portion of the energy of the firing cartridge to:
(a) Extract the expended cartridge case;
Page 1 - 132LR0737(01)

(b) Chamber the next cartridge; and
(c) Prepare the firing mechanism to fire again;
(2) Requires a separate movement for each individual operation of the trigger or
firing mechanism; and
(3) Is not a machine gun.
3. Possession of a rapid-fire device is a Class D crime.